Vermont statutes. Title 5 Aeronautics and Surface Transportation Generally
Chapter 66. Consolidation and Merger

§ 3498.
Liability to taxation.

Any railroad property which shall be sold to, merged into, or consolidated with the railroad property of another railroad company shall remain subject to the appraisal then made and in force for purposes of taxation under the new ownership, until a new appraisal shall be made in the usual course of business by the Commissioner of Taxes, and the resulting or successor corporation shall be liable for all taxes thereon.